Utah statutes.
41-1a-1306.   Abuse of persons with disabilities parking privileges -- Revocation of special plate or transferable ID card -- Fine.

(1)  A person with a disability who abuses the rights and privileges conferred under Section 41-1a-414 or allows an individual who is not a person with a disability to use those parking privileges may have his person with a disability special group license plate, temporary removable windshield placard, or removable windshield placard revoked by the division.

(2)  A person who violates Section 41-1a-414 shall pay a minimum fine of $125.

